Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF358.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 6 TLSB 1916YH (1) 91 jm/jh H.F. 358 Section 1. Section 422.12, subsection 2, paragraph c, 1 subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 (1) A volunteer fire fighter and volunteer emergency 3 medical services personnel member credit equal to two hundred 4 fifty one thousand dollars to compensate the taxpayer for the 5 voluntary services if the volunteer served for the entire 6 tax year. A taxpayer who is a paid employee of an emergency 7 medical services program or a fire department and who is also 8 a volunteer emergency medical services personnel member or 9 volunteer fire fighter in a city, county, or area governed 10 by an agreement pursuant to chapter 28E where the emergency 11 medical services program or fire department performs services, 12 shall qualify for the credit provided under this paragraph âcâ . 13 Sec. 2. Section 422.12, subsection 2, paragraph d, 14 subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 15 (1) A reserve peace officer credit equal to two hundred 16 fifty one thousand dollars to compensate the taxpayer for 17 services as a reserve peace officer if the reserve peace 18 officer served for the entire tax year. 19 Sec. 3. RETROACTIVE APPLICABILITY. This Act applies 20 retroactively to January 1, 2025, for tax years beginning on 21 or after that date. 22